apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÅÆÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖØÙÚÛÜàáâäåæçèéêëìíîïñòóôöøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="vber"/>
    <sdef n="vbhar"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="vbs"/>
    <sdef n="vbaux"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="part"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pret"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="ut"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="ea"/>
    <sdef n="da"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="pst"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="ssup"/>
    <sdef n="nst"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="indef"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
        <re>,</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
        <re>¿</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="begge__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="selv__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="in/gen__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r>gen<s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tet</l>
          <r>gen<s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r>gen<s n="prn"/><s n="ea"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>genting</l>
          <r>gen<s n="prn"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="de/__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ea"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ts</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   <!--   <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>-->
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="dem__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="ea"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="jeg__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="du__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="di/n__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ea"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="dig__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ha/n__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      </pardef>
      
      <pardef n="hans__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/un__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>un<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ende</l>
          <r>un<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      </pardef>
      
     <pardef n="hendes__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vi__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="I__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="de/__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="ea"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="ea"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nsamme</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tsamme</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mi/n__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ea"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
      
     <pardef n="mig__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <i>dig</i>
        <par n="dig__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>di</i>
        <par n="di/n__det"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>de</i>
        <par n="de/__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>du</i>
        <par n="du__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ha</i>
        <par n="ha/n__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>dem</i>
        <par n="dem__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hans</i>
        <par n="hans__det"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>h</i>
        <par n="h/un__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hendes</i>
        <par n="hendes__det"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>in</i>
        <par n="in/gen__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>jeg</i>
        <par n="jeg__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>I</i>
        <par n="I__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>vi</i>
        <par n="vi__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>mi</i>
        <par n="mi/n__det"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>mig</i>
        <par n="mig__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>begge</i>
        <par n="begge__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hinanden</i>
        <par n="begge__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>selv</i>
        <par n="selv__det"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>de</i>
        <par n="de/__det"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
